District of Columbia statutes.
47-376

Construction of subchapter.

(a)

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as impinging upon or otherwise superseding the authority otherwise vested by law in independent agencies or instrumentalities of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit the Mayor from establishing accounts within funds, to the same extent that he or she was authorized prior to the passage of this subchapter.

(c)

The Mayor shall promptly advise the Council on any changes in the financial management system required pursuant to § 2 of an Act to provide for an independent audit of the financial condition of the government of the District of Columbia.

June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 8, 27 DCR 1776
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-376.
The Act referred to in subsection (c) of this section is 90 Stat. 1205, Pub. L. 94-399, approved September 4, 1976, which established the Temporary Commission on Financial Oversight of the District of Columbia.